Hawaii statutes.
§466-36 Hawaii supplement to the peer
review report. (a) A firm required to undergo a peer review under this
chapter shall engage the services of a practitioner or firm holding a permit
issued under section 466-7 to perform the following procedures to supplement
the peer review report:

(1) Obtain from the reviewed firm a list of Hawaii
attest engagements included in the scope of the peer review, in accordance with
the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants Standards for Performing
and Reporting on Peer Reviews;

(2) Select one or more engagements from the list of
engagements obtained from the reviewed firm;

(3) Obtain from the reviewed firm, the reports,
financial statements, work papers, and work product resulting from the attest
engagements selected;

(4) Read and compare the reports, work papers, and
work product to an appropriate disclosure checklist to evaluate the firm's
compliance with professional standards; and

(5) Document all instances of noncompliance with
professional standards detected while performing the procedures listed in this
section.

(b) The procedures required by this section
shall be performed in accordance with AT section 201 of the Statements on
Standards for Attestation Engagements adopted by the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants.

(c) The Hawaii supplement to the peer review
report to the firm and to the board shall state, at a minimum, the following:

(1) Name of firm;

(2) Date the Hawaii supplement to the peer review
report was completed;

(3) Period that was reviewed;

(4) Any Hawaii office or offices selected;

(5) Number and type of Hawaii engagements reviewed;

(6) Any limitations that may have been imposed upon
the peer reviewer in complying with subsection (a), including the selection of Hawaii
engagements and peer review standards by the peer reviewer; provided that the
acceptability of the limitations shall be subject to board approval; and

(7) The procedures performed and any instances of
noncompliance with professional standards found.

(d) The practitioner or firm selected to
perform the procedures required by this section shall:

(1) Hold a permit to practice under section 466-7;

(2) Not be affiliated with the firm being reviewed;
and

(3) Be recognized as a qualified peer reviewer by a
sponsoring organization. [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 145, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next